Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB206.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "earned income" in section 501 of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act, is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Earned income." The compensation as required to be reported to or as determined by the Department of Revenue under section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, and rules and regulations promulgated under that section subject to the following:(1) Employee business expenses as reported to or determined by the Department of Revenue under Article III of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 shall constitute allowable deductions in determining earned income.(2) The term does not include:(i) Wages or compensation paid to individuals on active military service, regardless of whether it is earned for active military service inside or outside this Commonwealth[.], and to the spouses of such individuals, provided that the spouses reside with the individuals outside this Commonwealth.(ii) Offsets for business losses.(iii) The amount of any housing allowance provided to a member of the clergy.(3) For purposes of collection of earned income and net profits taxes under this chapter and for crediting purposes under section 317, the term shall include all taxes on earned income or net profits whether authorized by this act or any other law of this Commonwealth unless the law expressly provides otherwise.20250HB0206PN0154 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0206PN0154 - 3 - 12